Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.225

Director—Rule-making powers.

In accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, the director may issue rules under this chapter only for the purpose of governing the activities of licensed mortgage brokers, loan originators, and other persons subject to this chapter.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 7 s 70; 2006 c 19 s 14; 1994 c 33 s 15; 1993 c 468 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 26; 2010 1st sp.s. c 7: See note following RCW 43.03.027.

Adoption of rules—Severability—1993 c 468: See notes following RCW 19.146.0201.

Effective dates—1993 c 468: See note following RCW 19.146.200.